Connecticut, session 2026, HB05308.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 54-102kk of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law governing
[postconviction] post-conviction relief, any person who was convicted
of a crime and sentenced to incarceration may, at any time during the
term of such incarceration or after completion of such term and while
subject to the jurisdiction or supervision of any probation, parole or
correctional agency, file a petition with the sentencing court requesting
the DNA testing of any evidence that is in the possession or control of
the Division of Criminal Justice, any law enforcement agency, any
laboratory or the Superior Court. The petitioner shall state under
penalties of perjury that the requested testing is related to the
investigation or prosecution that resulted in the petitioner's conviction
and that the evidence sought to be tested contains biological evidence.
HB5308 / File No. 531 1

HB5308 File No. 531
(b) After notice to the prosecutorial official and a hearing, the court
shall order DNA testing if it finds that:
(1) A reasonable probability exists that the petitioner would not have
been prosecuted or convicted if exculpatory results had been obtained
through DNA testing;
(2) The evidence is still in existence and is capable of being subjected
to DNA testing;
(3) The evidence, or a specific portion of the evidence identified by
the petitioner, was never previously subjected to DNA testing, or the
testing requested by the petitioner may resolve an issue that was never
previously resolved by previous testing; and
(4) The petition before the Superior Court was filed in order to
demonstrate the petitioner's innocence and not to delay the
administration of justice.
(c) After notice to the prosecutorial official and a hearing, the court
may order DNA testing if it finds that:
(1) A reasonable probability exists that the requested testing will
produce DNA results which would have altered the verdict or reduced
the petitioner's sentence if the results had been available at the prior
proceedings leading to the judgment of conviction;
(2) The evidence is still in existence and is capable of being subjected
to DNA testing;
(3) The evidence, or a specific portion of the evidence identified by
the petitioner, was never previously subjected to DNA testing, or the
testing requested by the petitioner may resolve an issue that was never
previously resolved by previous testing; and
(4) The petition before the Superior Court was filed in order to
demonstrate the petitioner's innocence and not to delay the
administration of justice.
HB5308 / File No. 531 2

HB5308 File No. 531
(d) The costs of DNA testing ordered pursuant to this section shall be
borne by the state or the petitioner, as the court may order in the
interests of justice, except that DNA testing shall not be denied because
of the inability of the petitioner to pay the costs of such testing.
(e) In a proceeding under this section, the petitioner shall have the
right to be represented by counsel and, if the petitioner is indigent, the
court shall appoint counsel for the petitioner in accordance with section
51-296.
(f) An order of the court denying the petitioner's request for DNA
testing of any evidence that is in the possession or control of the Division
of Criminal Justice, any law enforcement agency, any laboratory or the
Superior Court shall be a final judgment for purposes of an appeal.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 54-102kk
JUD Joint Favorable
HB5308 / File No. 531 3

HB5308 File No. 531
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Criminal Justice, Div. GF - Potential 73,456 96,775
Cost
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Potential 28,749 37,972
Benefits1 Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill may result in additional petitions for DNA testing2 which
may result in a potential cost to the Division of Criminal Justice (DCJ)
and the Office of the State Comptroller (OSC) for fringe benefits.
To the extent that this change results in an increase in petitions and
associated hearings great enough to necessitate an additional Deputy
Assistant State's Attorney position in DCJ, the agency will incur a cost
of $73,456 in FY 27 and $96,775 in FY 28,3 and there will be a cost of
$28,749 in FY 27 and $37,972 in FY 28 for associated fringe benefits.
The Out Years
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
Under current law, these types of petitions are only available for those that are
currently incarcerated. This bill will extend eligibility to those who are otherwise
subjected to the jurisdiction of probation, parole, or correction.
FY 27's estimate is adjusted for partial year salary costs and for a one-time equipment
purchase of about $2,000. The annual salary for a Deputy Assistant State's Attorney is
$93,275. FY 28 includes an annual cost for other expenses of $1,500.
HB5308 / File No. 531 4

HB5308 File No. 531
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation and the actual increase in
petitions.
HB5308 / File No. 531 5

HB5308 File No. 531
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5308
AN ACT CONCERNING POST-CONVICTION DNA TESTING.